Utah statutes.
10-3-1306.   Interest in business entity regulated by municipality -- Disclosure statement required.

(1)  Every appointed or elected officer or municipal employee who is an officer, director, agent, or employee or the owner of a substantial interest in any business entity which is subject to the regulation of the municipality in which he is an elected or appointed officer or municipal employee shall disclose the position held and the nature and value of his interest upon first becoming appointed, elected, or employed by the municipality, and again at any time thereafter if the elected or appointed officer's or municipal employee's position in the business entity has changed significantly or if the value of his interest in the entity has increased significantly since the last disclosure.

(2)  The disclosure shall be made in a sworn statement filed with the mayor.  The mayor shall report the substance of all such disclosure statements to the members of the governing body, or may provide to the members of the governing body copies of the disclosure statement within 30 days after the statement is received by him.

(3)  This section does not apply to instances where the value of the interest does not exceed $2,000.  Life insurance policies and annuities may not be considered in determining the value of any such interest.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

